Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 5. Investments, Loans, and Deposits.

Sec. 06.26.250.
Regulations on investments.

The department may adopt regulations to establish limits, requirements, or exemptions for particular classes or categories of investment, or limit or expand investment authority for trust companies for particular classes or categories of securities or other property.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For investments, loans, deposits, and trust assets, see 3 AAC 4, art. 3.

Sec. 06.26.260.
Pledge of assets.

A trust company may not pledge or create a lien on any of the assets belonging to the trust company except to secure

the repayment of money borrowed;

trust deposits as specifically authorized or required by AS

06.26.370

or by regulations adopted under this chapter; or

deposits made by the United States government, the state, or a municipality, or an agency of those governmental bodies.

An act, a deed, a conveyance, a pledge, or a contract that violates this section is void.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For investments, loans, deposits, and trust assets, see 3 AAC 4, art. 3.